Washington statutes.
RCW 10.82.010

Execution for fines and costs.

Upon a judgment for fine and costs, and for all adjudged costs, execution shall be issued against the property of the defendant, and returned in the same manner as in civil actions.

[Code 1881 s 1120; 1873 p 242 s 278; 1854 p 123 s 142; RRS s 2201.]

NOTES:

Judgments a lien on realty: RCW 10.64.080.